Oklahoma, session 2026, HB3749.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 19 O.S. 2021, Section 527, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 527. A. The sheriff, treasurer, clerk, court clerk,
each individual county commissioner, or assessor in a county shall
have the authority to employ a general counsel, either in-house as a
staff attorney or through an outside law firm, to advise or
represent that officer and his or her office in the performance of
the official duties of that office. The Board of County
Commissioners shall approve all contracts for outside counsel. A
general counsel employed pursuant to this section shall be
compensated from the funds of the employing county office.
ENGR. H. B. NO. 3749 Page 1

B. The sheriff may employ outside counsel pursuant to this
section to provide immediate representation to a deputy of the
sheriff in a deputy-involved shooting incident; provided, the
sheriff shall not continue payment to the counsel if the deputy
involved is charged with any crime arising from the incident.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.
Passed the House of Representatives the 25th day of March, 2026.


Presiding Officer of the House
of Representatives

Passed the Senate the ___ day of __________, 2026.


Presiding Officer of the Senate










ENGR. H. B. NO. 3749 Page 2